Utah statutes.
39-6-26.   Charges to be forwarded to governor or adjutant general.
When a person is held for trial by military court, the commanding officer
shall forward the charges, together with the investigation and related papers,
to the governor or the adjutant general within five working days, excluding
holidays, after the accused is ordered into arrest or confinement.
